Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.440

Electronic wills—Execution—Procedure.

(1) Subject to RCW 11.12.450(4), an electronic will must be:

(a) A record that is readable as text at the time of signing under (b) of this subsection;

(b) Signed by:

(i) The testator; or

(ii) Another individual in the testator's name, in the testator's physical presence, and by the testator's direction; and

(c) Signed in the physical or electronic presence of the testator and at the testator's direction or request by at least two competent witnesses after:

(i) The signing of the will under (b) of this subsection; or

(ii) The testator's acknowledgment of the signing of the will under (b) of this subsection or acknowledgment of the will.

(2) Intent of a testator that the record under subsection (1)(a) of this section be the testator's electronic will may be established by extrinsic evidence.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1005.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.